Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-21,126
Answer.

The defendant shall appear and answer such information in the usual way, and issue being joined it shall be tried in the ordinary manner.

R.S.1867, Code § 709, p. 518;

R.S.1913, § 8333;

C.S.1922, § 9285;

C.S.1929, § 20-21,117;

R.S.1943, § 25-21,126.

Defendant is required to answer the charges made against him in the information. State ex rel. Johnson v. Conservative Savings & Loan Assn., 143 Neb. 805, 11 N.W.2d 89 (1943).

Defendant must show precisely under what authority he holds office. State ex rel. Sabin v. Tillma, 32 Neb. 789, 49 N.W. 806 (1891).